Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-1118
Sensitive data; sale; consent required.

(1) A person described by subdivision (1)(c) of section 87-1103 shall not engage in the sale of personal data that is sensitive data without receiving prior consent from the consumer.

(2) A person who violates this section is subject to the penalty under section 87-1124.

Laws 2024, LB1074, § 18.